Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 49 Service Contracts

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance § 11.

44 C.J.S Insurance § 2.

§ 26-49-101.
Scope and purposes.

The purpose of this article is to create a legal framework within which service contracts may be sold in this state.

The following are exempt from W.S.

26-49-103

through

26-49-111

:

Warranties;

Maintenance agreements;

Warranties, service contracts and maintenance agreements offered by public utilities on their transmission devices to the extent they are regulated by public service commission; and

Service contracts sold or offered for sale to persons other than consumers.

The types of agreements referred to in subsection (b) of this section do not have to comply with any provision of the insurance law of this state.

This article does not apply to:

Mechanical breakdown insurers licensed pursuant to chapter 37 of this code;

To mechanical breakdown insurance organizations who maintain a license pursuant to W.S.

26-37-106

;

To motor club services regulated pursuant to the Motor Club Services Act;

Theft protection programs or their accompanying warranties except that theft protection programs and their accompanying warranties shall be subject to the enforcement provisions of W.S.

26-49-110

.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1; 2022 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or” at the end of (d)(ii); and added (d)(iv).

Prospective operation. —

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 3(a), provides: “Service contracts entered into prior to January 1, 2000, and renewals thereof, may but are not required to comply with this act. Providers and other persons are not required to comply with this act until January 1, 2000. A provider or other person may, but is not required to, implement the requirements of this act prior to January 1, 2000. The failure of a provider or other person to comply with this act or otherwise to administer a service contract plan, in the manner required by this act prior to January 1, 2000, shall not be admissible in any court, arbitration or alternative dispute resolution proceedings or otherwise used to prove that the action of any person or the service contract was unlawful or otherwise improper.”

§ 26-49-102.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Administrator” means the person who is responsible for the administration of the service contracts or the service contracts plans or who is responsible for any filings required by this article;

“Consumer” means a natural person who buys other than for purposes of resale any tangible personal property that is distributed in commerce and that is normally used for personal, family or household purposes and not for business or research purposes;

“Maintenance agreement” means a contract of limited duration that provides for scheduled maintenance only;

“Nonoriginal manufacturer’s parts” means replacement parts not made for or by the original manufacturer of the property, commonly referred to as “after market parts”;

“Premium” means the consideration paid to an insurer for a reimbursement insurance policy;

“Provider” means a person who is contractually obligated to the service contract holder under the terms of the service contract;

“Provider fee” means the consideration paid for a service contract;

“Reimbursement insurance policy” means a policy of insurance that is issued to a provider to provide reimbursement to the provider or to pay on behalf of the provider all covered contractual obligations incurred by the provider under the terms of the insured service contracts issued or sold by the provider;

“Service contract” means a contract or agreement for a separately stated consideration for a specific duration to perform the repair, replacement or maintenance of property or indemnification for repair, replacement or maintenance, for the operational or structural failure due to a defect in materials or workmanship or normal wear and tear, with or without additional provision for incidental payment or indemnity under limited circumstances, including, but not limited to, towing, rental and emergency road service. Service contracts may provide for the repair, replacement or maintenance of property for damage resulting from power surges and accidental damage from handling. “Service contract” also includes a contract or agreement for one (1) or more of the following:

The removal of dents, dings or creases that can be repaired using the process of paintless dent removal without affecting the existing paint finish and without replacing vehicle body panels or sanding, bonding or painting;

The repair or replacement of tires or wheels damaged as a result of coming into contact with ordinary road hazards. A contract or agreement meeting the definition set forth in this subparagraph in which the party obligated to perform is either a tire or wheel manufacturer or a motor vehicle manufacturer is exempt from the requirements of this chapter;

The repair of small windshield chips or cracks in or the replacement of the entire windshield as a result of damage caused by road hazards;

The repair of damage to the interior components of a motor vehicle caused by wear and tear but which expressly excludes the replacement of any part or component of a motor vehicle’s interior;

The replacement of a motor vehicle key or key fob in the event that the key or key fob becomes inoperable, lost or stolen;

In conjunction with a motor vehicle leased for use, the repair, replacement or maintenance of property or indemnification for repair, replacement or maintenance due to excess wear and use, damage to items such as tires, paint cracks or chips, interior stains, rips or scratches, exterior dents or scratches, windshield cracks or chips, missing interior or exterior parts or excess mileage that result in a lease-end charge, or any other charge for damage that is deemed as excess wear and use by a lessor under a motor vehicle lease, provided that any repair, replacement, maintenance or indemnification shall not exceed the purchase price of the vehicle.

“Service contract holder” or “contract holder” means a person who is the purchaser or holder of a service contract;

“Warranty” means a warranty made solely by the manufacturer, importer or seller of property or services without consideration, that is not negotiated or separated from the sale of the product and is incidental to the sale of the product, that guarantees indemnity for defective parts, mechanical or electrical breakdown, labor or other remedial measures, such as repair or replacement of the property or repetition of services;

“Incidental theft protection program payment” means expenses specified in a theft protection program warranty that are incurred by the warranty holder due to the failure of the warranty holder’s theft protection program to perform as provided in the theft protection program warranty. Incidental theft protection program payments may include insurance policy deductibles, rental vehicle charges, the difference between the actual value of the stolen vehicle at the time of theft and the cost of a replacement vehicle, sales taxes, registration fees, transaction fees and mechanical inspection fees. Incidental theft protection program payments may be reimbursements in either a fixed amount specified in the theft protection program warranty or by use of a formula itemizing specific incidental theft protection program payments that may be due to the warranty holder;

“Road hazard” means a hazard that is encountered while driving a motor vehicle and that may include, but is not limited to, potholes, rocks, wood debris, metal parts, glass, plastic, curbs or composite scraps;

“Theft protection program” means a device or system that:

Is installed on or applied to a motor vehicle and designed to prevent the theft of the vehicle or, if the vehicle is stolen, aid in the recovery of the vehicle;

Includes a theft protection program warranty;

May include but is not limited to:

An alarm system;

A body part marking product;

A steering lock;

A window etch product;

A pedal or ignition lock;

A fuel or ignition kill switch;

An electronic, radio or satellite tracking device.

“Theft protection program warranty” means a written agreement by a warrantor that provides if the theft protection program fails to prevent loss or damage to a motor vehicle from theft, the warrantor will pay to or on behalf of the warranty holder specified incidental theft protection program payments as a result of the failure of the theft protection program to perform pursuant to the terms of the theft protection program warranty.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1; 2010, ch. 59, § 1; 2022 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(xix), added the introductory language, and (a)(xix)(A) through (D).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “including, but not limited to, potholes, curbs, rocks, wood debris, metal parts, glass, plastic or composite scraps” at the end of the first sentence of (a)(ix)(B); in (a)(ix)(C), substituted “in or” for “but which expressly excludes,” added “as a result of damage caused by road hazards”; and added (a)(ix)(E), (a)(ix)(F), and (a)(xii) through (a)(xv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-49-103.
Requirements for doing business.

A provider may, but is not required to, appoint an administrator or other designee to be responsible for any or all of the administration of service contracts and compliance with this article.

Service contracts shall not be issued, sold or offered for sale in this state unless the provider has:

Provided a receipt for, or other written evidence of, the purchase of the service contract to the contract holder; and

Provided a copy of the service contract to the service contract holder within a reasonable period of time from the date of purchase.

Each provider of service contracts sold in this state shall file a registration with the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Each provider shall:

Pay to the commissioner a fee in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200.00) annually;

Verify compliance annually with the faithful performance requirements specified in subsection (d) of this section on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

In order to assure the faithful performance of a provider’s obligations to its service contract holders, each provider shall be responsible for complying with the requirements of any one (1) of the following paragraphs:

Insure all service contracts under a reimbursement insurance policy issued by an insurer authorized to transact insurance in this state or issued pursuant to chapter 11 of this code;

Maintain a funded reserve account for its obligations under its service contracts issued and outstanding in this state. The reserves shall not be less than forty percent (40%) of the gross consideration received, less claims paid, on the sale of the service contract for all in force contracts. The reserve account shall be subject to examination and review by the commissioner. The provider shall also place in trust with the commissioner a financial security deposit, having a value of not less than five percent (5%) of the gross consideration received, less claims paid, on the sale of the service contract for all service contracts issued and in force, but not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), consisting of one (1) of the following:

A surety bond issued by an authorized surety;

Securities of the type eligible for deposit by authorized insurers in this state;

Cash;

A letter of credit issued by a qualified financial institution; or

Another form of security prescribed by regulations issued by the commissioner.

Maintain, or its parent company maintain, a net worth or stockholders’ equity of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00). The provider shall also upon request, provide the commissioner with a copy of provider’s or the provider’s parent company’s most recent Form 10-K or Form 20-F filed with the securities and exchange commission within the last calendar year, or if the company does not file with the securities and exchange commission, a copy of the provider’s or the provider’s parent company’s financial statements, which show a net worth of the provider or its parent company of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00). If the provider’s parent company’s Form 10-K, Form 20-F or financial statements are filed to meet the provider’s financial stability requirement, then the parent company shall agree to guarantee the obligations of the provider relating to service contracts sold by the provider in this state.

Service contracts shall require the provider to permit the original service contract holder to return the service contract within twenty (20) days of the date the service contract was mailed to the service contract holder or within ten (10) days of delivery if the service contract is delivered to the service contract holder at the time of sale or within a longer time period permitted under the service contract. Upon return of the service contract to the provider within the applicable time period, if no claim has been made under the service contract prior to its return to the provider, the service contract is void and the provider shall refund to the service contract holder, or credit the account of the service contract holder, with the full purchase price of the service contract. The right to void the service contract provided in this subsection is not transferable and shall apply only to the original service contract purchaser, and only if no claim has been made prior to its return to the provider. A ten percent (10%) penalty per month shall be added to a refund that is not paid or credited within forty-five (45) days after return of the service contract to the provider.

Provider fees collected on service contracts shall not be subject to premium taxes. Premiums for reimbursement insurance policies shall be subject to applicable taxes.

Except for the registration requirement in subsection (c) of this section, providers and related service contract sellers, administrators and other persons marketing, selling or offering to sell service contracts are exempt from any licensing requirements of this state.

The marketing, sale, offering for sale, issuance, making, proposing to make and administration of service contracts by providers and related service contract sellers, administrators and other persons shall be exempt from all other provisions of this state’s insurance law.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1; 2018 ch. 21, § 1, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (c), designated former ending text as (c)(i); added (c)(ii); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

§ 26-49-104.
Required provisions; reimbursement insurance policy.

Reimbursement insurance policies insuring service contracts issued, sold or offered for sale in this state shall state that the insurer that issued the reimbursement insurance policy shall reimburse or pay on behalf of the provider any covered sums the provider is legally obligated to pay or shall provide the service which the provider is legally obligated to perform according to the provider’s contractual obligations under the insured service contracts issued or sold by the provider.

In the event covered service is not provided by the service contract provider within sixty (60) days of proof of loss by the service contract holder, the contract holder is entitled to apply directly to the reimbursement insurance company.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 26-49-105.
Required disclosures; service contracts.

Service contracts marketed, sold, offered for sale, issued, made, proposed to be made, or administered in this state shall be written, printed or typed in clear, understandable language that is easy to read and shall disclose the requirements set forth in this section, as applicable.

Service contracts insured under a reimbursement insurance policy pursuant to W.S. 26-49-103(d)(i) shall contain a statement in substantially the following form: “Obligations of the provider under this service contract are insured under a service contract reimbursement insurance policy.” The service contract shall state the name and address of the insurer.

Service contracts not insured under a reimbursement insurance policy pursuant to W.S. 26-49-103(d)(i) shall contain a statement in substantially the following form: “Obligations of the provider under this service contract are backed by the full faith and credit of the provider.”

Service contracts shall state the name and address of the provider and shall identify any administrator if different from the provider, the service contract seller, and the service contract holder to the extent that the name of the service contract holder has been furnished by the service contract holder. The identities of such parties are not required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be added to the service contract at the time of sale.

Service contracts shall state the purchase price of the service contract and the terms under which the service contract is sold. The purchase price is not required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be negotiated at the time of sale with the service contract holder.

Service contracts shall state the existence of any deductible amount, if applicable.

Service contracts shall specify the merchandise and services to be provided and any limitations, exceptions or exclusions.

Service contracts covering automobiles shall state whether the use of nonoriginal manufacturer’s parts is allowed.

Service contracts shall state any restrictions governing the transferability of the service contract, if applicable.

Service contracts shall state the terms, restrictions or conditions governing cancellation of the service contract prior to the termination or expiration date of the service contract by either the provider or by the service contract holder. The provider of the service contract shall mail a written notice to the service contract holder at the last known address of the service contract holder contained in the records of the provider at least ten (10) days prior to cancellation by the provider. Prior notice is not required if the reason for cancellation is nonpayment of the provider fee, a material misrepresentation by the service contract holder to the provider or a substantial breach of duties by the service contract holder relating to the covered product or its use. The notice shall state the effective date of the cancellation and the reason for the cancellation.

Service contracts shall set forth the obligations and duties of the service contract holder, such as the duty to protect against any further damage and any requirement to follow owner’s manual instructions.

Service contracts shall state whether or not the service contract provides for or excludes consequential damages or preexisting conditions, if applicable.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-49-106.
Prohibited acts.

A provider shall not use in its name the words insurance, casualty, surety, mutual or any other words descriptive of the insurance, casualty or surety business; or a name deceptively similar to the name or description of any insurance or surety corporation, or to the name of any other provider. The word “guaranty” or similar word may be used by a provider. This section shall not apply to a company that was using any of the prohibited language in its name prior to April 1, 1999. However, a company using the prohibited language in its name shall include in its service contracts a statement in substantially the following form: “This agreement is not an insurance contract.”

A provider or its representative shall not in its service contracts or literature make, permit or cause to be made any false or misleading statement, or deliberately omit any material statement that would be considered misleading if omitted.

A person, such as a bank, savings and loan association, lending institution, manufacturer or seller of any product, shall not require the purchase of a service contract as a condition of a loan or a condition for the sale of any property.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 26-49-107.
Record keeping requirements.

The provider shall keep accurate accounts, books, and records concerning transactions regulated under this article. The provider’s accounts, books and records shall include the following:

Copies of each type of service contract sold;

The name and address of each service contract holder, to the extent that the name and address have been furnished by the service contract holder;

A list of the locations where service contracts are marketed, sold or offered for sale;

Written claims files, which shall contain at least the dates and description of claims related to the service contracts.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the provider shall retain all records required to be maintained by this section for at least one (1) year after the specified period of coverage has expired.

The records required under this article may be, but are not required to be, maintained on a computer disk or other record keeping technology. If the records are maintained in other than hard copy, the records shall be capable of duplication to legible hard copy at the request of the commissioner.

A provider discontinuing business in this state shall maintain its records until it furnishes the commissioner satisfactory proof that it has discharged all obligations to service contract holders in this state.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 26-49-108.
Cancellation of reimbursement insurance policy.

As applicable, an insurer that issued a reimbursement insurance policy shall not terminate the policy until a notice of termination in accordance with chapter 35 of this code, has been mailed or delivered to the commissioner. The termination of a reimbursement insurance policy shall not reduce the issuer’s responsibility for service contracts issued by providers prior to the date of the termination.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 26-49-109.
Obligations of reimbursement insurance policy insurers.

Providers are considered to be the agent of the insurer which issued the reimbursement insurance policy for purposes of obligating the insurer to service contract holders in accordance with the service contract and this article. In cases where a provider is acting as an administrator and enlists other providers, the provider acting as the administrator shall notify the insurer of the existence and identities of the other providers.

This article shall not prevent or limit the right of an insurer which issued a reimbursement insurance policy to seek indemnification or subrogation against a provider if the issuer pays or is obligated to pay the service contract holder sums that the provider was obligated to pay pursuant to the provisions of the service contract.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 26-49-110.
Enforcement provisions.

The commissioner may conduct examinations of providers, administrators, insurers or other persons to enforce this article and protect service contract holders in this state. Upon request of the commissioner, the provider shall make all accounts, books and records concerning service contracts sold by the provider available to the commissioner which are necessary to enable the commissioner to reasonably determine compliance or noncompliance with this article.

The commissioner may take action which is necessary or appropriate to enforce the provisions of this article and the commissioner’s regulations and orders, and to protect service contract holders in this state.

If a provider has violated this article or the commissioner’s regulations or orders, the commissioner may issue an order directed to that provider to cease and desist from committing violations of this article or the commissioner’s regulations or orders; may issue an order prohibiting that provider from selling or offering for sale service contracts in violation of this article; or may issue an order imposing a civil penalty on that provider; or any combination of the foregoing, as applicable. A person aggrieved by an order issued under this section may request a hearing before the commissioner pursuant to W.S.

26-2-125

.

The commissioner may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction, for an injunction or other appropriate relief to enjoin threatened or existing violations of this article or of the commissioner’s orders or regulations. An action filed under this section also may seek restitution on behalf of persons aggrieved by a violation of this article or orders or regulations of the commissioner.

A person who is found to have violated this article or orders or regulation of the commissioner may be ordered to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in an amount determined by the commissioner of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) per violation and no more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) in the aggregate for all violations of a similar nature. For purposes of this section, violations shall be of a similar nature if the violation consists of the same or similar course of conduct, action or practice, irrespective of the number of times the act, conduct or practice which is determined to be a violation of this article occurred.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 26-49-111.
Authority to develop regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to implement this article.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 146, § 1.